Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-417
Effect of act on notary public that does not perform online notarial acts.

Nothing in the Online Notary Public Act requires a notary public to register as an online notary public if he or she does not perform online notarial acts.

Laws 2019, LB186, § 17.